Lecture7/malay.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
^[ ^] +Noun +Unmarked +Plural

LEXICON Root
0:^[{         NRoots ;
              NRoots ;

LEXICON NRoots
buku          NSuff ;
lembu         NSuff ;
pelabuhan     NSuff ;

LEXICON NSuff
+Noun:0       Num ;

LEXICON Num
+Unmarked:0   # ;
+Plural:}^2^] # ;
